Maine, session 132, LD1765.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9082, as amended by PL 2017, c. 210, Pt. B, §29, is further
amended to read:
§9082. License required
A person may not conduct, control, manage or operate, for compensation, directly or
indirectly, any manufactured housing community unless licensed by the board. Licenses
issued must be displayed in a place readily visible to customers or other persons using a
licensed establishment.
Any person desiring a license shall submit satisfactory evidence, in a form acceptable
to the board, of that person's ability to comply with the minimum standards of this
subchapter and all rules adopted under this subchapter.
An applicant for a license to operate a manufactured housing community shall include
the following information with the license application:
1. Applicant's name. The applicant's legal name;
2. Parent or subsidiary corporation. The legal name of all parent or subsidiary
corporations of the applicant and companies owned by the applicant;
3. Number of sites in manufactured housing community to be licensed. The
number of sites in the manufactured housing community to be licensed;
4. Number of sites in manufactured housing community occupied. The number of
sites in the manufactured housing community occupied as of the date of the application, if
any;
5. Lot rent. The minimum and maximum lot rent in effect as of the date of the
application, if any;
6. Age or income requirements. Age or income requirements for homeowners living
in the manufactured housing community;
Page 1 - 132LR1109(03)

7. Seasonal. Whether the manufactured housing community is seasonal; and
8. Common expenses. The most common expenses included in the calculation of rent
and fees, such as pet fees, vehicle fees, ground maintenance costs, snow removal costs,
trash pickup costs, laundry facility costs and the cost of providing additional storage.
Sec. 2. Office of Policy Innovation and the Future to design strategies;
report. The Office of Policy Innovation and the Future, established in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, section 3102, shall:
1. Develop a model rent stabilization ordinance for use by municipalities and post the
model ordinance on the office's publicly accessible website;
2. Identify barriers to and solutions for building residential dwelling units in vacant
lots;
3. Explore opportunities to provide technical and financial support to manufactured
housing community homeowners to maintain the affordability of rent and fees within the
community;
4. Recommend ways to proactively support manufactured housing community
homeowners who seek to form a cooperative or other organization or align with a nonprofit
organization to purchase the homeowners' housing community; and
5. Evaluate traditional mortgages as a financing option for manufactured housing
community homeowners who wish to purchase their manufactured housing community.
In conducting activities required by this section, the Office of Policy Innovation and
the Future may work with other state agencies or interested parties.
By December 31, 2025, the office shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee
on Housing and Economic Development with the results of the work required in this
section. The committee may report out legislation based on the report to the Second
Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR1109(03)